nb: Type steininnfatning: Stavfatning; Sargfatning; Kanalfatning; Klyngefatning; Planfatning; Gypsyfatning; Usynlig fatning; Pavé; Krappefatning; Spennfatning; Annet
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia kameňa: Priečkové; Obrubové; Kanálikové; Zhlukové; Zapustené; Zapustené (Gypsy); Neviditeľné; Pavé; Krapňové; Napínacie; Iné
tr: Taş montaj tipi: Barlı; Çerçeveli; Kanallı; Küme; Gömme; Çingene; Görünmez; Pavé; Tırnaklı; Sıkıştırma; Diğer
ru: Тип закрепки камня: Стержневая; Глухая (ободковая); Канальная; Кластерная; Утопленная; Цыганская (Gypsy); Невидимая; Паве; Крапановая; Натяжная; Другое
ko: 보석 세팅 유형: 바; 베젤; 채널; 클러스터; 플러시; 집시; 인비저블; 파베; 프롱; 텐션; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de cravação da pedra: Barra; Cravação inglesa; Cravação em calha; Em cacho; Embutido; Estilo cigano; Invisível; Pavé; Garras; Tensão; Outro
fr: Type de sertissage de la pierre: Barrette; Serti clos; Serti rail; En grappe; Serti masse; Serti gitan; Serti invisible; Serti pavé; Serti à griffes; Serti tension; Autre
es: Tipo de configuración de la piedra: Barra; Bisel; Canal; Racimo; Incrustado; Gitano; Invisible; Pavé; Garras; Tensión; Otro
hu: Kőbeállítások típusa: Sínfoglalat; Tokfoglalat; Csatornás foglalat; Csoportos foglalat; Süllyesztett foglalat; Gypsy foglalat; Láthatatlan foglalat; Pavé; Karmos foglalat; Feszített foglalat; Egyéb
ja: 石留めタイプ: バー; ベゼル; チャネル; クラスター; フラッシュ; ジプシー; インビジブル; パヴェ; プロング; テンション; その他
lt-LT: Akmens tvirtinimo tipas: Su tilteliu; Su apvadu („Bezel“); Kanalinis; Klasterinis; Įleistas („Flush“); „Gypsy“; Nematomas; „Pavé“; Su dantukais („Prong“); Įtemptas; Kita
pt-BR: Pedra tipo de cravação: Barra; Cravação inglesa; Trilho; Cluster; Embutida; Cigana; Invisível; Pavê; Garras; Tensão; Outro
zh-TW: 石材鑲嵌類型: 棒鑲; 包鑲; 軌道鑲; 簇鑲; 平鑲; 吉普賽鑲; 隱形鑲; 密釘鑲; 爪鑲; 張力鑲; 其他
it: Tipo di posizionamento della pietra: A barra; A castone; A binario; A grappolo; Incassata; Gypsy; Invisibile; Pavé; A griffe; A tensione; Altro
el: Τύπος δεσίματος λίθου: Με μπάρες; Καστόνι; Σε ράγα; Cluster (Σύμπλεγμα); Χωνευτό; Gypsy; Αόρατο; Pavé; Με δόντια; Με τάση; Άλλο
zh-CN: 宝石镶嵌类型: 棒镶; 包镶; 槽镶; 簇镶; 平镶; 吉普赛镶; 隐形镶; 密镶; 爪镶; 张力镶; 其他
vi: Kiểu gắn đá: Thanh; Bezel; Rãnh; Cụm; Chìm; Gypsy; Ẩn; Pavé; Chấu; Căng ép; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta vpetja kamna: S prečko; Okvirno (bezel); Kanal; Grozd; Poravnano; Cigansko (gypsy); Nevidno; Pavé; Kremplji; Napenjalno; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta postavljanja kamena: Bar (u nizu); Okvir (bezel); U kanalu (channel); Cluster; U ravnini (flush); Gypsy; Nevidljivo; Pavé; S krakovima (prong); Tenzijsko; Ostalo
th: ประเภทหินนั่นเอง: บาร์; ขอบฝังหุ้ม; แชนเนล; คลัสเตอร์; ฝังเสมอผิว; ยิปซี; ฝังแบบซ่อน; ปาเว่; หนามเตย; ตัวเรือนแรงตึง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип на закрепване на камъка: Баретен обков; Каса; Канален обков; Клъстер; Вграден; Джипси; Невидим обков; Паве; Със зъбци; С напрежение; Друго
de: Art der Steinfassung: Stegfassung; Zargenfassung; Kanalfassung; Cluster; Einriebfassung; Gypsy-Fassung; Unsichtbar; Pavé; Krappenfassung; Spannfassung; Andere
cs: Typ uchycení kamene: V řadě; Zasunovací osazení (bezel); Do drážky; Skupinové; Do roviny (flush); Gypsy; Neviditelné; Pavé; Krapnové; Napínací; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de montură a pietrei: Bară; Casete (Bezel); Canal; Grup (Cluster); Îngropată (Flush); Gypsy; Invizibilă; Pavé; Gheruțe; Tensiune; Altele
nl: Steen zettingstype: Brugzetting; Zetkast; Railzetting; Cluster; Verzonken; Gypsy-zetting; Onzichtbaar; Pavé; Chaton; Spanzetting; Overig
sv: Steninstallationer av typ: Stångfattning; Sargfattning; Kanalfattning; Klusterfattning; Slätfattning; Försänkt fattning; Osynlig fattning; Pavé; Krappfattning; Spännfattning; Övrigt
en: Stone setting type: Bar; Bezel; Channel; Cluster; Flush; Gypsy; Invisible; Pavé; Prong; Tension; Other
pl: Typ mocowania kamienia: Baryłkowa (bar); Pełna (bezel); Kanałowa (channel); Klastrowa (cluster); Zlicowana (flush); Gypsy; Niewidoczna (invisible); Pavé; Kraponowa (prong); Naprężeniowa (tension); Inna
da: Stenfatningstype: Bar-fatning; Zargefatning; Kanal-fatning; Klynge-fatning; Forsænket fatning; Gypsy-fatning; Usynlig fatning; Pavé-fatning; Krappe-fatning; Spænd-fatning; Andet
fi: Kiven kiinnitystyyppi: Palkki-istutus; Kehysistutus; Kanavaistutus; Klusteri-istutus; Upotusistutus; Gypsy-istutus; Näkymätön istutus; Pavé-istutus; Kruunuistutus; Pingotusistutus; Muu